Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2314.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; IMPROVING LAKE ALICE WATER QUALITY.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency for a two-year grant to the city of Fergus Falls to address water-quality concerns at Lake Alice. The city of Fergus Falls must use the grant to contract for nonchemical, flow-through, water-quality improvement services; testing; necessary infrastructure; training; and maintenance. new text end